Vermont, session 2025-2026, H774.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. INTENT; THREE-YEAR EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX FREEZE
It is the intent of the General Assembly to cap education property tax rates
at fiscal year 2026 levels for fiscal years 2027 through 2029. It is further the
VT LEG #386131 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.774
2026 Page 2 of 2
intent of the General Assembly to offset any resulting deficit in the Education
Fund with monies from the General Fund to ensure that statewide education
spending is fully funded for the duration of the education property tax freeze.
Sec. 2. EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX FREEZE; FYS 2027–2029
Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 5402, in each of fiscal years 2027 through
2029, the Commissioner of Taxes shall bill a property taxpayer in a
municipality at the lesser of:
(1) the homestead or nonhomestead rate, as applicable, determined for
the municipality pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 5402(b)(1) for fiscal year 2026; or
(2) the homestead or nonhomestead rate, as applicable, determined for
the municipality pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 5402(b)(1) for that fiscal year.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386131 v.1